Utah statutes.
13-10-2.   Purpose of chapter.

In enacting this chapter, it is the purpose of the Legislature to prevent the piracy of recorded materials by making it mandatory that certain copying of recorded materials be made only with the express consent of the owner.



Amended by Chapter 325, 1995 General Session

